Tennessee, session 114, SB0645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-9-110, is amended by adding the
following new subsection (d):
(d) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, voting equipment and machines
must not transmit or receive a ballot, or otherwise be used to cast a ballot, using the
internet, except as authorized for members of the military and overseas citizens in
accordance with chapter 6, part 5 of this title.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a county election commission shall
not accept a post office box (P.O. Box) as a valid residential address for purposes of
registering to vote or voting in this state.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-7-115(a), is amended by deleting
the second sentence and substituting:
If a registered voter has changed residence to another place inside Tennessee but
outside of the county where the voter is registered, the voter must vote in a polling place
in accordance with the voter's current residence.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0645
000637
- 1 -